Tennessee, session 114, SB1153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 6, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) ''Immediate family'' means a physician's or podiatrist's spouse, parent,
child, sibling, or another individual in relation to whom a physician's or podiatrist's
personal or emotional involvement may render that physician or podiatrist unable
to exercise detached professional judgment in reaching diagnostic or therapeutic
decisions;
(2) ''Physician'' means a physician licensed under this chapter or chapter
9 of this title;
(3) ''Podiatrist'' has the same meaning as defined in § 63-3-101; and
(4) ''Scheduled drug'' means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor
in Schedules I through V of the federal Controlled Substances Act (21 U.S.C. §
812).
(b) A physician or podiatrist shall maintain records of all treatment provided
pursuant to this section.
(c) A physician or podiatrist shall not prescribe, dispense, or administer
medication for, or otherwise treat, the physician's or podiatrist's own self or immediate
family, except in minor, self-limited, short-term, or urgent, emergency situations.
SB1153
003038
- 1 -

(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c) or (e), a physician or podiatrist shall not
prescribe, dispense, or administer a scheduled drug to the physician's or podiatrist's own
self or for immediate family.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (c), a physician may prescribe, dispense, or
administer medication for, or otherwise treat, immediate family within the physician's
regular scope of practice if there is no other physician offering healthcare services at a
location within thirty (30) miles of the physician's primary practice site.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003038